Michigan, session 2025-2026, HB5522.
people of the state of michigan enact: Sec. 16215. (1) Subject to subsections (2) to (6), a qualified licensee who holds a license other than a health profession subfield license may delegate to a licensed or unlicensed individual who is otherwise qualified by education, training, or experience the performance of selected acts, tasks, or functions where the acts, tasks, or functions fall within the scope of practice of the qualified licensee's profession and will be performed under the qualified licensee's supervision. A qualified licensee shall not delegate an act, task, or function under this section if the act, task, or function, under standards of acceptable and prevailing practice, requires the level of education, skill, and judgment required of the qualified licensee under this article. (2) Subject to subsection (1) and except as otherwise provided in this subsection and subsections (3) and (4), a qualified licensee who is an allopathic physician or osteopathic physician and surgeon shall delegate an act, task, or function that involves the performance of a procedure that requires the use of surgical instrumentation only to an individual who is licensed under this article. A qualified licensee who is an allopathic physician or osteopathic physician and surgeon may delegate an act, task, or function described in this subsection to an individual who is not licensed under this article if the unlicensed individual is 1 or more of the following and if the procedure is directly supervised by a licensed qualified licensee who is an allopathic physician or osteopathic physician and surgeon who is physically present during the performance of the procedure: (a) A student enrolled in a school of medicine or osteopathic medicine approved by the Michigan board of medicine or the Michigan board of osteopathic medicine and surgery. (b) A student enrolled in a physician's assistant training program approved by the joint physician's assistant task force created under part 170. (3) Subject to subsection (1), a qualified licensee who is an allopathic physician or osteopathic physician and surgeon may delegate an act, task, or function described in subsection (2) to an individual who is not licensed under this article and who is 1 of the following: (a) Performing acupuncture. This subdivision does not apply beginning 36 months after the effective date of the rules promulgated under section 16525 on the licensure of acupuncturists. (b) Surgically removing only bone, skin, blood vessels, cartilage, dura mater, ligaments, tendons, pericardial tissue, or heart valves only from a deceased individual for transplantation, implantation, infusion, injection, or other medical or scientific purpose. (4) Subject to subsection (1), a qualified licensee who is an allopathic physician or osteopathic physician and surgeon may delegate an act, task, or function described in subsection (2) to an individual who is not licensed under this article if the procedure is directly supervised by a licensed qualified licensee who is an allopathic physician or osteopathic physician and surgeon who and is physically present during the performance of the procedure, the delegation of such procedure is not prohibited or otherwise restricted by the board or that health facility or agency, and the delegation of that act, task, or function is specifically authorized by that health facility or agency to be delegated and performed by either of the following unlicensed individuals: (a) A surgical technologist who meets the qualifications established by the health facility or agency with which he or she the surgical technologist is employed or under contract. (b) A surgical first assistant who meets the qualifications established by the health facility or agency with which he or she the surgical first assistant is employed or under contract. (5) A board or task force may promulgate rules to further prohibit or otherwise restrict delegation of specific acts, tasks, or functions to a licensed or unlicensed individual if the board or task force determines that the delegation constitutes or may constitute a danger to the health, safety, or welfare of the patient or public. (6) To promote safe and competent practice, a board or task force may promulgate rules to specify conditions under which, and categories and types of licensed and unlicensed individuals for whom, closer supervision may be required for acts, tasks, and functions delegated under this section. (7) An individual who performs acts, tasks, or functions delegated pursuant to under this section does not violate the part that regulates the scope of practice of that health profession. (8) The amendatory act that added this subsection 2005 PA 211 does not require new or additional third party third-party reimbursement or mandated worker's compensation benefits for services rendered by an individual authorized to perform those services under subsection (4). (9) As used in this section, "qualified licensee" means any of the following: (a) An individual who holds a license other than a health profession subfield license. (b) An individual who holds a health profession subfield license to engage in the practice as a physician's assistant under this article. Sec. 17001. (1) As used in this part: (a) "Academic institution" means either of the following: (i) A medical school approved by the board. (ii) A hospital licensed under article 17 that meets all of the following requirements: (A) Was the sole sponsor or a co-sponsor, if each other co-sponsor is either a medical school approved by the board or a hospital owned by the federal government and directly operated by the United States Department of Veterans Affairs, of not less than 4 postgraduate education residency programs approved by the board under section 17031(1) for not less than the 3 years immediately preceding the date of an application for a limited license under section 16182(2)(c) or an application for a full license under section 17031(2), if at least 1 of the residency programs is in the specialty area of medical practice, or in a specialty area that includes the subspecialty of medical practice, in which the applicant for a limited license proposes to practice or in which the applicant for a full license has practiced for the hospital. (B) Has spent not less than $2,000,000.00 for medical education during each of the 3 years immediately preceding the date of an application for a limited license under section 16182(2)(c) or an application for a full license under section 17031(2). As used in this sub-subparagraph, "medical education" means the education of physicians and candidates for degrees or licenses to become physicians, including, but not limited to, physician staff, residents, interns, and medical students. (b) "Electrodiagnostic studies" means the testing of neuromuscular functions utilizing nerve conduction tests and needle electromyography. It does not include the use of surface electromyography. (c) "Genetic counselor" means an individual who is licensed under this part to engage in the practice of genetic counseling. (d) "Medical care services" service" means those services a service within the scope of practice of physicians who are licensed or authorized by the board, a participating medical provider, except those services a service that the board prohibits or otherwise restricts within a practice agreement or determines shall must not be delegated by a physician participating medical provider because a delegation would endanger the health and safety of patients a patient as provided for in section 17048(1). (e) "Participating physician" medical provider" means a physician , a physician designated by a group of physicians under section 17049 to represent that group, or a physician designated by a health facility or agency under section 20174 to represent that health facility or agency.or physician's assistant, as described in section 17049(1). (f) "Physician" means an individual who is licensed or authorized under this article to engage in the practice of medicine. (g) "Podiatrist" means an individual who is licensed under this article to engage in the practice of podiatric medicine and surgery. (h) "Practice agreement" means an agreement described in section 17047. (i) "Practice of genetic counseling" means provision of any of the following services: (i) Obtaining and evaluating individual, family, and medical histories to determine the genetic risk for genetic or medical conditions or diseases in a client, the client's descendants, or other family members of the client. (ii) Discussing with a client the features, natural history, means of diagnosis, genetic and environmental factors, and management of the genetic risks of genetic or medical conditions or diseases. (iii) Identifying and coordinating appropriate genetic laboratory tests and other diagnostic studies for genetic assessment of a client. (iv) Integrating genetic laboratory test results and other diagnostic studies with personal and family medical history to assess and communicate a client's risk factors for genetic or medical conditions or diseases. (v) Explaining to a client the clinical implications of genetic laboratory tests and other diagnostic studies and their results. (vi) Evaluating the responses of a client and the client's family to a genetic or medical condition or disease or to the risk of recurrence of that condition or disease and providing client-centered counseling and anticipatory guidance. (vii) Identifying and utilizing community resources that provide medical, educational, financial, and psychosocial support and advocacy to a client. (viii) Providing written documentation of medical, genetic, and counseling information for families of and health care professionals of a client. (j) "Practice of medicine" means the diagnosis, treatment, prevention, cure, or relieving of a human disease, ailment, defect, complaint, or other physical or mental condition, by attendance, advice, device, diagnostic test, or other means, or offering, undertaking, attempting to do, or holding oneself out as able to do, any of these acts. (k) "Practice as a physician's assistant" means the practice of medicine with a participating physician under a practice agreement.as provided in section 17047. (l) "Qualified supervisor" means an individual who is a genetic counselor and who holds a license under this part other than a temporary or limited license. (m) "Task force" means the joint task force created in section 17025. (n) "Temporary licensed genetic counselor" means a genetic counselor who has been issued a temporary license under this article. (2) In addition to the definitions in this part, article 1 contains definitions and principles of construction applicable to all articles in this code and part 161 contains definitions applicable to this part. Sec. 17047. (1) A Except as otherwise provided in subsection (5), a physician's assistant shall not engage in the practice as a physician's assistant except under the terms of a practice agreement with a participating medical provider that meets the requirements of this section. (2) A Subject to subsection (4), a practice agreement must include all of the following: (a) A process between the physician's assistant and participating physician medical provider for communication, availability, and decision making when providing medical treatment to a patient. The process must utilize the knowledge and skills of the physician's assistant and participating physician medical provider based on their the physician's assistant's and participating medical provider's education, training, and experience. (b) A protocol for designating an alternative physician participating medical provider for consultation in situations in which the participating physician medical provider is not available for consultation. (c) The signature of the physician's assistant and the participating physician.medical provider. (d) A termination provision that allows the physician's assistant or participating physician medical provider to terminate the practice agreement by providing written notice at least 30 days before the date of termination. (e) Subject to section 17048, the duties and responsibilities of the physician's assistant and participating physician. medical provider. The practice agreement shall not include as a duty or responsibility of the physician's assistant or participating physician medical provider an act, task, or function that the physician's assistant or participating physician medical provider is not qualified to perform by education, training, or experience and that is not within the scope of the license held by the physician's assistant or participating physician.medical provider. (f) A requirement that the participating physician medical provider verify the physician's assistant's credentials. (3) The number of physician's assistants in a practice agreement with a participating physician medical provider and the number of individuals to whom a physician participating medical provider has delegated the authority to perform acts, tasks, or functions are subject to section 16221. (4) If a practice agreement is entered into, amended, extended, or renewed on or before December 31, 2026, the practice agreement must be between a participating medical provider described in section 17049(1)(a) and a physician's assistant. If a practice agreement is entered into, amended, extended, or renewed on or after January 1, 2027, the practice agreement must be between a participating medical provider described in section 17049(1)(a) or (b) and a physician's assistant. (5) Beginning January 1, 2027, subsection (1) does not apply to a physician's assistant who has at least 1,000 hours of experience engaging in the practice as a physician's assistant. Sec. 17048. (1) Except for a medical care service within a practice agreement, to the extent that a particular selected medical care service requires extensive medical training, education, or ability or poses serious risks to the health and safety of patients, the board may prohibit or otherwise restrict the delegation of that medical care service or may require higher levels of supervision. To the extent that a particular medical care service requires extensive training, education, or ability or poses serious risks to the health or safety of patients, the board may prohibit or otherwise restrict that medical care service within a practice agreement. (2) For purposes of section 17076(2) and (3), the department, in consultation with the board, may promulgate rules concerning the prescribing of drugs by a physician's assistant. Subject to section 17076, the rules may define the drugs or classes of drugs that a physician's assistant may not prescribe and other procedures and protocols necessary to promote consistency with federal and state drug control and enforcement laws. (3) Beginning on July 19, 2010, if 1 or more individuals licensed under part 170 to engage in the practice of medicine, licensed under part 175 to engage in the practice of osteopathic medicine and surgery, or licensed under part 180 to engage in the practice of podiatric medicine and surgery, and 1 or more physician's assistants organize a professional service corporation under section 4 of former 1962 PA 192, a professional corporation under section 284 of the business corporation act, 1972 PA 284, MCL 450.1284, or a professional limited liability company under section 904 of the Michigan limited liability company act, 1993 PA 23, MCL 450.4904, the physicians who are parties to a practice agreement with the physician's assistants shall must be shareholders in the same professional service corporation or professional corporation or members in the same professional limited liability company as the physician's assistants and shall must meet all of the applicable requirements of part 170, 175, or 180. If 1 or more physician's assistants organized a professional service corporation under section 4 of former 1962 PA 192, a professional corporation under section 284 of the business corporation act, 1972 PA 284, MCL 450.1284, or a professional limited liability company under section 904 of the Michigan limited liability company act, 1993 PA 23, MCL 450.4904, before July 19, 2010 that has only physician's assistants as shareholders or members, the physicians participating medical providers who are parties to a practice agreement with the physician's assistants shall must meet all of the applicable requirements of part 170, 175, or 180. (4) In addition to the requirements of section 17068 and beginning on July 19, 2010, the department shall include on the form used for renewal of licensure a space for a physician's assistant to disclose whether he or she the physician's assistant is a shareholder in a professional service corporation under section 4 of former 1962 PA 192, or a member in a professional limited liability company under section 904 of the Michigan limited liability company act, 1993 PA 23, MCL 450.4904, that was organized before July 19, 2010. A physician's assistant who is a shareholder in a professional service corporation or a member in a professional limited liability company described in this subsection shall disclose all of the following in the form used for renewal of licensure provided by the department: (a) Whether any individuals licensed under part 170 to engage in the practice of medicine, licensed under part 175 to engage in the practice of osteopathic medicine and surgery, or licensed under part 180 to engage in the practice of podiatric medicine and surgery are shareholders in the professional service corporation or members in the professional limited liability company. (b) The name and license number of the individual licensed under part 170 to engage in the practice of medicine, licensed under part 175 to engage in the practice of osteopathic medicine and surgery, or licensed under part 180 to engage in the practice of podiatric medicine and surgery who is a party to a practice agreement with the physician's assistant. (c) Whether the individual licensed under part 170 to engage in the practice of medicine, licensed under part 175 to engage in the practice of osteopathic medicine and surgery, or licensed under part 180 to engage in the practice of podiatric medicine and surgery disclosed in subdivision (b) is a shareholder in the same professional service corporation or member in a professional limited liability company as the physician's assistant. Sec. 17049. (1) Any of the following may enter into a practice agreement as a participating medical provider: (a) A physician, 1 or more physicians in a group of physicians practicing other than as sole practitioners may designate 1 or more physicians in who are designated by the group to enter into a practice agreement, under section 17047.or 1 or more physicians designated by a health facility or agency under section 20174 to represent the health facility or agency. (b) Subject to this subdivision, a physician's assistant, a physician's assistant who is designated by a group of physicians or physician's assistants practicing other than as sole practitioners to represent the group, or a physician's assistant who is designated by a health facility or agency under section 20174 to represent the health facility or agency. A physician's assistant is not eligible to enter into a practice agreement as a participating medical provider unless the physician's assistant has at least 1,000 hours of experience engaging in the practice as a physician's assistant. (2) Notwithstanding any law or rule to the contrary, a physician participating medical provider is not required to countersign orders written in a patient's clinical record by a physician's assistant with whom the physician participating medical provider has a practice agreement. Notwithstanding any law or rule to the contrary, a physician participating medical provider is not required to sign an official form that lists the physician's participating medical provider's signature as the required signatory if that official form is signed by a physician's assistant with whom the physician participating medical provider has a practice agreement. Sec. 17074. (1) A physician's assistant shall not undertake or represent that he or she the physician's assistant is qualified to undertake the provision of a medical care service that he or she the physician's assistant knows or reasonably should know to be outside his or her the physician's assistant's competence or is prohibited by law. (2) A physician's assistant shall not do any of the following: (a) Perform acts, tasks, or functions to determine the refractive state of a human eye or to treat refractive anomalies of the human eye, or both. (b) Determine the spectacle or contact lens prescription specifications required to treat refractive anomalies of the human eye, or determine modification of spectacle or contact lens prescription specifications, or both. (3) A physician's assistant may perform routine visual screening or testing, postoperative care, or assistance in the care of medical diseases of the eye. under a practice agreement. Sec. 17076. (1) A physician's assistant may make calls or go on rounds in private homes, public institutions, emergency vehicles, ambulatory care clinics, hospitals, intermediate or extended care facilities, health maintenance organizations, nursing homes, or other health care facilities. in accordance with a practice agreement. Notwithstanding any law or rule to the contrary, a physician's assistant may make calls or go on rounds as provided in this subsection without restrictions on the time or frequency of visits by a physician or the physician's assistant. (2) A physician's assistant who is a party to a practice agreement may prescribe a drug in accordance with procedures and protocols for the prescription established by rule of the department in consultation with the appropriate board. A physician's assistant may prescribe a drug, including a controlled substance that is included in schedules 2 to 5 of part 72. If a physician's assistant prescribes a drug under this subsection, the physician's assistant's name shall must be used, recorded, or otherwise indicated in connection with that prescription. If a physician's assistant prescribes a drug under this subsection that is included in schedules 2 to 5, the physician's assistant's DEA registration number shall must be used, recorded, or otherwise indicated in connection with that prescription. (3) A physician's assistant may order, receive, and dispense complimentary starter dose drugs, including controlled substances that are included in schedules 2 to 5 of part 72. If a physician's assistant orders, receives, or dispenses a complimentary starter dose drug under this subsection, the physician's assistant's name shall must be used, recorded, or otherwise indicated in connection with that order, receipt, or dispensing. If a physician's assistant orders, receives, or dispenses a complimentary starter dose drug under this subsection that is included in schedules 2 to 5, the physician's assistant's DEA registration number shall must be used, recorded, or otherwise indicated in connection with that order, receipt, or dispensing. As used in this subsection, "complimentary starter dose" means that term as defined in section 17745. It is the intent of the legislature in enacting this subsection to allow a pharmaceutical manufacturer or wholesale distributor, as those terms are defined in part 177, sections 17706 and 17709, to distribute complimentary starter dose drugs to a physician's assistant, as described in this subsection, in compliance with section 503(d) of the federal food, drug, and cosmetic act, 21 USC 353. Sec. 17501. (1) As used in this part: (a) "Electrodiagnostic studies" means the testing of neuromuscular functions utilizing nerve conduction tests and needle electromyography. It does not include the use of surface electromyography. (b) "Medical care services" service" means those services a service within the scope of practice of physicians who are licensed or authorized by the board, a participating medical provider, except those services a service that the board prohibits or otherwise restricts within a practice agreement or determines shall must not be delegated by a physician participating medical provider without endangering the health and safety of patients a patient as provided for in section 17548(1). (c) "Participating physician" medical provider" means a physician , a physician designated by a group of physicians under section 17549 to represent that group, or a physician designated by a health facility or agency under section 20174 to represent that health facility or agency.or physician's assistant, as described in section 17549(1). (d) "Physician" means an individual who is licensed or authorized under this article to engage in the practice of osteopathic medicine and surgery. (e) "Practice agreement" means an agreement described in section 17547. (f) "Practice of osteopathic medicine and surgery" means a separate, complete, and independent school of medicine and surgery utilizing full methods of diagnosis and treatment in physical and mental health and disease, including the prescription and administration of drugs and biologicals, operative surgery, obstetrics, radiological and other electromagnetic emissions, and placing special emphasis on the interrelationship of the musculoskeletal system to other body systems. (g) "Practice as a physician's assistant" means the practice of osteopathic medicine and surgery with a participating physician under a practice agreement.as provided in section 17547. (h) "Task force" means the joint task force created in section 17025. (2) In addition to the definitions in this part, article 1 contains general definitions and principles of construction applicable to all articles in the code and part 161 contains definitions applicable to this part. Sec. 17547. (1) A Except as otherwise provided in subsection (5), a physician's assistant shall not engage in the practice as a physician's assistant except under the terms of a practice agreement with a participating medical provider that meets the requirements of this section. (2) A Subject to subsection (4), a practice agreement must include all of the following: (a) A process between the physician's assistant and participating physician medical provider for communication, availability, and decision making when providing medical treatment to a patient. The process must utilize the knowledge and skills of the physician's assistant and participating physician medical provider based on their the physician's assistant's and participating medical provider's education, training, and experience. (b) A protocol for designating an alternative physician participating medical provider for consultation in situations in which the participating physician medical provider is not available for consultation. (c) The signatures of the physician's assistant and the participating physician.medical provider. (d) A termination provision that allows the physician's assistant or participating physician medical provider to terminate the practice agreement by providing written notice at least 30 days before the date of termination. (e) Subject to section 17548, the duties and responsibilities of the physician's assistant and participating physician. medical provider. The practice agreement shall not include as a duty or responsibility of the physician's assistant or participating physician medical provider an act, task, or function that the physician's assistant or participating physician medical provider is not qualified to perform by education, training, or experience and that is not within the scope of the license held by the physician's assistant or participating physician.medical provider. (f) A requirement that the participating physician medical provider verify the physician's assistant's credentials. (3) The number of physician's assistants in a practice agreement with a participating physician medical provider and the number of individuals to whom a physician participating medical provider has delegated the authority to perform acts, tasks, or functions are subject to section 16221. (4) If a practice agreement is entered into, amended, extended, or renewed on or before December 31, 2026, the practice agreement must be between a participating medical provider described in section 17549(1)(a) and a physician's assistant. If a practice agreement is entered into, amended, extended, or renewed on or after January 1, 2027, the practice agreement must be between a participating medical provider described in section 17549(1)(a) or (b) and a physician's assistant. (5) Beginning January 1, 2027, subsection (1) does not apply to a physician's assistant who has at least 1,000 hours of experience engaging in the practice as a physician's assistant. Sec. 17548. (1) Except for a medical care service within a practice agreement, to the extent that a particular selected medical care service requires extensive medical training, education, or ability or pose serious risks to the health and safety of patients, the board may prohibit or otherwise restrict the delegation of that medical care service or may require higher levels of supervision. To the extent that a particular medical care service requires extensive training, education, or ability or poses serious risks to the health or safety of patients, the board may prohibit or otherwise restrict that medical care service within a practice agreement. (2) A physician's assistant may make calls or go on rounds in private homes, public institutions, emergency vehicles, ambulatory care clinics, hospitals, intermediate or extended care facilities, health maintenance organizations, nursing homes, or other health care facilities. in accordance with a practice agreement. Notwithstanding any law or rule to the contrary, a physician's assistant may make calls or go on rounds as provided in this subsection without restrictions on the time or frequency of visits by a physician or the physician's assistant. (3) For purposes of subsection (4), the department, in consultation with the board, may promulgate rules concerning the prescribing of drugs by a physician's assistant. Subject to subsection (4), the rules may define the drugs or classes of drugs that a physician's assistant may not prescribe and other procedures and protocols necessary to promote consistency with federal and state drug control and enforcement laws. (4) A physician's assistant who is a party to a practice agreement may prescribe a drug in accordance with procedures and protocols for the prescription established by rule of the department in consultation with the appropriate board. A physician's assistant may prescribe a drug, including a controlled substance that is included in schedules 2 to 5 of part 72. If a physician's assistant prescribes a drug under this subsection, the physician's assistant's name shall must be used, recorded, or otherwise indicated in connection with that prescription. If a physician's assistant prescribes a drug under this subsection that is included in schedules 2 to 5, the physician's assistant's DEA registration number shall must be used, recorded, or otherwise indicated in connection with that prescription. (5) A physician's assistant may order, receive, and dispense complimentary starter dose drugs including controlled substances that are included in schedules 2 to 5 of part 72. If a physician's assistant orders, receives, or dispenses a complimentary starter dose drug under this subsection, the physician's assistant's name shall must be used, recorded, or otherwise indicated in connection with that order, receipt, or dispensing. If a physician's assistant orders, receives, or dispenses a complimentary starter dose drug under this subsection that is included in schedules 2 to 5, the physician's assistant's DEA registration number shall must be used, recorded, or otherwise indicated in connection with that order, receipt, or dispensing. As used in this subsection, "complimentary starter dose" means that term as defined in section 17745. It is the intent of the legislature in enacting this subsection to allow a pharmaceutical manufacturer or wholesale distributor, as those terms are defined in part 177, sections 17706 and 17709, to distribute complimentary starter dose drugs to a physician's assistant, as described in this subsection, in compliance with section 503(d) of the federal food, drug, and cosmetic act, 21 USC 353. Sec. 17549. (1) A Any of the following may enter into a practice agreement as a participating medical provider: (a) A physician, 1 or more physicians in a group of physicians practicing other than as sole practitioners may designate 1 or more physicians in the who are designated by the group to enter into a practice agreement, under section 17547.or 1 or more physicians designated by a health facility or agency under section 20174 to represent the health facility or agency. (b) Subject to this subdivision, a physician's assistant, a physician's assistant who is designated by a group of physicians or physician's assistants practicing other than as sole practitioners to represent the group, or a physician's assistant who is designated by a health facility or agency under section 20174 to represent the health facility or agency. A physician's assistant is not eligible to enter into a practice agreement as a participating medical provider unless the physician's assistant has at least 1,000 hours of experience engaging in the practice as a physician's assistant. (2) Notwithstanding any law or rule to the contrary, a physician participating medical provider is not required to countersign orders written in a patient's clinical record by a physician's assistant with whom the physician participating medical provider has a practice agreement. Notwithstanding any law or rule to the contrary, a physician participating medical provider is not required to sign an official form that lists the physician's participating medical provider's signature as the required signatory if that official form is signed by a physician's assistant with whom the physician participating medical provider has a practice agreement. Sec. 18001. (1) As used in this part: (a) "Medical care services" means those services a service within the scope of practice of a podiatric physicians licensed by the board, participating medical provider, except those services a service that the board prohibits or otherwise restricts within a practice agreement or determines shall must not be delegated by a podiatric physician participating medical provider without endangering the health and safety of patients a patient as provided for in section 18048. (b) "Participating podiatrist" medical provider" means a podiatric physician or a podiatric physician designated by a group of podiatric physicians under section 18049 to represent that group.physician's assistant, as described in section 18049(1). (c) "Podiatric physician" or "podiatrist" means an individual who is licensed under this article to engage in the practice of podiatric medicine and podiatric surgery. (d) "Practice agreement" means an agreement described in section 18047. (e) "Practice as a physician's assistant" means the practice of podiatric medicine and podiatric surgery with a participating podiatric physician under a practice agreement.as provided in section 18047. (f) Except as otherwise provided in subdivision (g), "practice of podiatric medicine and podiatric surgery" or "practice of podiatric medicine and surgery" means any of the following: (i) The evaluation, diagnosis, management, and prevention of conditions of the lower extremities, including local manifestations of systemic disease in the human foot and ankle, by attending to and advising patients and through the use of devices, diagnostic tests, drugs and biologicals, surgical procedures, or other means. The evaluation, diagnosis, management, and prevention of conditions of the lower extremities may include osseous and soft tissue procedures that address the pathology of the foot, ankle, and the contiguous attachments below the tibial tuberosity. (ii) The treatment of ulcerations below the tibial tuberosity and of human nail diseases, callosities, and verruca. (g) "Practice of podiatric medicine and podiatric surgery" or "practice of podiatric medicine and surgery" does not include amputations proximal to the tibiotalar joint, proximal osseous procedures that do not involve the tibiotalar joint, or the administration of intravenous sedation or general anesthesia. (h) "Task force" means the joint task force created in section 17025. (2) In addition to the definitions in this part, article 1 contains general definitions and principles of construction applicable to all articles in this code and part 161 contains definitions applicable to this part. Sec. 18047. (1) A Except as otherwise provided in subsection (5), a physician's assistant shall not engage in the practice as a physician's assistant except under the terms of a practice agreement with a participating medical provider that meets the requirements of this section. (2) A Subject to subsection (4), a practice agreement must include all of the following: (a) A process between the physician's assistant and participating podiatrist medical provider for communication, availability, and decision making when providing medical treatment to a patient. The process must utilize the knowledge and skills of the physician's assistant and participating podiatrist medical provider based on their education, training, and experience. (b) A protocol for designating an alternative podiatrist participating medical provider for consultation in situations in which the participating podiatrist medical provider is not available for consultation. (c) The signature of the physician's assistant and the participating podiatrist.medical provider. (d) A termination provision that allows the physician's assistant or participating podiatrist medical provider to terminate the practice agreement by providing written notice at least 30 days before the date of termination. (e) Subject to section 18048, the duties and responsibilities of the physician's assistant and participating podiatrist. medical provider. The practice agreement shall must not include as a duty or responsibility of the physician's assistant or participating podiatrist medical provider an act, task, or function that the physician's assistant or participating podiatrist medical provider is not qualified to perform by education, training, or experience and that is not within the scope of the license held by the physician's assistant or participating podiatrist.medical provider. (f) A requirement that the participating podiatrist medical provider verify the physician's assistant's credentials. (3) The number of physician's assistants in a practice agreement with a participating podiatrist medical provider and the number of individuals to whom a podiatrist participating medical provider has delegated the authority to perform acts, tasks, or functions are subject to section 16221. (4) If a practice agreement is entered into, amended, extended, or renewed on or before December 31, 2026, the practice agreement must be between a participating medical provider described in section 18049(1)(a) and a physician's assistant. If a practice agreement is entered into, amended, extended, or renewed on or after January 1, 2027, the practice agreement must be between a participating medical provider described in section 18049(1)(a) or (b) and a physician's assistant. (5) Beginning January 1, 2027, subsection (1) does not apply to a physician's assistant who has at least 1,000 hours of experience engaging in the practice as a physician's assistant. Sec. 18049. (1) Any of the following may enter into a practice agreement as a participating medical provider: (a) A podiatrist or 1 or more podiatrists in a group of podiatrists practicing other than as sole practitioners may designate 1 or more podiatrists in who are designated by the group to enter into a practice agreement. under section 18047. (b) Subject to this subdivision, a physician's assistant or a physician's assistant who is designated by a group of physicians or physician's assistants practicing other than as sole practitioners to represent the group. A physician's assistant is not eligible to enter into a practice agreement as a participating medical provider unless the physician's assistant has at least 1,000 hours of experience engaging in the practice as a physician's assistant. (2) Notwithstanding any law or rule to the contrary, a podiatrist participating medical provider is not required to countersign orders written in a patient's clinical record by a physician's assistant with whom the podiatrist participating medical provider has a practice agreement. Notwithstanding any law or rule to the contrary, a podiatrist participating medical provider is not required to sign an official form that lists the podiatrist's participating medical provider's signature as the required signatory if that official form is signed by a physician's assistant with whom the podiatrist participating medical provider has a practice agreement. Sec. 18051. (1) A physician's assistant may make calls or go on rounds in private homes, public institutions, emergency vehicles, ambulatory care clinics, hospitals, intermediate or extended care facilities, health maintenance organizations, nursing homes, or other health care facilities. in accordance with a practice agreement. Notwithstanding any law or rule to the contrary, a physician's assistant may make calls or go on rounds as provided in this subsection without restrictions on the time or frequency of visits by a podiatrist or the physician's assistant. (2) A physician's assistant who is a party to a practice agreement may prescribe a drug in accordance with procedures and protocols for the prescription established by rule of the department in consultation with the appropriate board. A physician's assistant may prescribe a drug, including a controlled substance that is included in schedules 2 to 5 of part 72. If a physician's assistant prescribes a drug under this subsection, the physician's assistant's name shall must be used, recorded, or otherwise indicated in connection with that prescription. If a physician's assistant prescribes a drug under this subsection that is included in schedules 2 to 5, the physician's assistant's DEA registration number shall must be used, recorded, or otherwise indicated in connection with that prescription. (3) A physician's assistant may order, receive, and dispense complimentary starter dose drugs, including controlled substances that are included in schedules 2 to 5 of part 72. If a physician's assistant orders, receives, or dispenses a complimentary starter dose drug under this subsection, the physician's assistant's name shall must be used, recorded, or otherwise indicated in connection with that order, receipt, or dispensing. If a physician's assistant orders, receives, or dispenses a complimentary starter dose drug under this subsection that is included in schedules 2 to 5, the physician's assistant's DEA registration number shall must be used, recorded, or otherwise indicated in connection with that order, receipt, or dispensing. As used in this subsection, "complimentary starter dose" means that term as defined in section 17745. It is the intent of the legislature in enacting this subsection to allow a pharmaceutical manufacturer or wholesale distributor, as those terms are defined in part 177, sections 17706 and 17709, to distribute complimentary starter dose drugs to a physician's assistant, as described in this subsection, in compliance with section 503(d) of the federal food, drug, and cosmetic act, 21 USC 353. Sec. 20174. A Subject to sections 17049 and 17549, a health facility or agency may designate 1 or more physicians or physician's assistants to enter into a practice agreement as participating medical providers under section 17047 or 17547. Sec. 20201. (1) A health facility or agency that provides services directly to patients or residents and is licensed under this article shall adopt a policy describing the rights and responsibilities of patients or residents admitted to the health facility or agency. Except for a licensed health maintenance organization that is subject to chapter 35 of the insurance code of 1956, 1956 PA 218, MCL 500.3501 to 500.3573, the health facility or agency shall post the policy at a public place in the health facility or agency and shall provide the policy to each member of the health facility or agency staff. Patients or residents shall must be treated in accordance with the policy. (2) The policy describing the rights and responsibilities of patients or residents required under subsection (1) shall must include, as a minimum, all of the following: (a) A patient or resident shall must not be denied appropriate care on the basis of race, religion, color, national origin, sex, age, disability, marital status, sexual preference, or source of payment. (b) An individual who is or has been a patient or resident is entitled to inspect, or receive for a reasonable fee, a copy of his or her the individual's medical record upon request in accordance with the medical records access act, 2004 PA 47, MCL 333.26261 to 333.26271. Except as otherwise permitted or required under the health insurance portability and accountability act of 1996, Public Law 104-191, or regulations promulgated under that act, 45 CFR parts 160 and 164, a third party shall must not be given a copy of the patient's or resident's medical record without the prior authorization of the patient or resident. (c) A patient or resident is entitled to confidential treatment of personal and medical records, and may refuse their release to a person outside the health facility or agency except as required because of a transfer to another health care facility, as required by law or third party payment contract, or as permitted or required under the health insurance portability and accountability act of 1996, Public Law 104-191, or regulations promulgated under that act, 45 CFR parts 160 and 164. (d) A patient or resident is entitled to privacy, to the extent feasible, in treatment and in caring for personal needs with consideration, respect, and full recognition of his or her the patient's or resident's dignity and individuality. (e) A patient or resident is entitled to receive adequate and appropriate care, and to receive, from the appropriate individual within the health facility or agency, information about his or her the patient's or resident's medical condition, proposed course of treatment, and prospects for recovery, in terms that the patient or resident can understand, unless medically contraindicated as documented in the medical record by the attending physician, a physician's assistant, with whom the physician has a practice agreement, or an advanced practice registered nurse. (f) A patient or resident is entitled to refuse treatment to the extent provided by law and to be informed of the consequences of that refusal. If a refusal of treatment prevents a health facility or agency or its staff from providing appropriate care according to ethical and professional standards, the relationship with the patient or resident may be terminated upon reasonable notice. (g) A patient or resident is entitled to exercise his or her the patient's or resident's rights as a patient or resident and as a citizen, and to this end may present grievances or recommend changes in policies and services on behalf of himself or herself the patient or resident or others to the health facility or agency staff, to governmental officials, or to another person of his or her the patient's or resident's choice within or outside the health facility or agency, free from restraint, interference, coercion, discrimination, or reprisal. A patient or resident is entitled to information about the health facility's or agency's policies and procedures for initiation, review, and resolution of patient or resident complaints. (h) A patient or resident is entitled to information concerning an experimental procedure proposed as a part of his or her the patient's or resident's care and has the right to refuse to participate in the experimental procedure without jeopardizing his or her the patient's or resident's continuing care. (i) A patient or resident is entitled to receive and examine an explanation of his or her the patient's or resident's bill regardless of the source of payment and to receive, upon request, information relating to financial assistance available through the health facility or agency. (j) A patient or resident is entitled to know who is responsible for and who is providing his or her the patient's or resident's direct care, to receive information concerning his or her the patient's or resident's continuing health needs and alternatives for meeting those needs, and to be involved in his or her the patient's or resident's discharge planning, if appropriate. (k) A patient or resident is entitled to associate and have private communications and consultations with his or her the patient's or resident's physician, or a with the patient's or resident's physician's assistant, with whom the physician has a practice agreement, with his or her the patient's or resident's advanced practice registered nurse, with his or her the patient's or resident's attorney, or with any other individual of his or her the patient's or resident's choice and to send and receive personal mail unopened on the same day it is received at the health facility or agency, unless medically contraindicated as documented in the medical record by the attending physician, a physician's assistant, with whom the physician has a practice agreement, or an advanced practice registered nurse. A patient's or resident's civil and religious liberties, including the right to independent personal decisions and the right to knowledge of available choices, shall must not be infringed and the health facility or agency shall encourage and assist in the fullest possible exercise of these rights. A patient or resident may meet with, and participate in, the activities of social, religious, and community groups at his or her the patient's or resident's discretion, unless medically contraindicated as documented in the medical record by the attending physician, a physician's assistant, with whom the physician has a practice agreement, or an advanced practice registered nurse. (l) A patient or resident is entitled to be free from mental and physical abuse and from physical and chemical restraints, except those restraints authorized in writing by the attending physician, by a physician's assistant, with whom the physician has a practice agreement, or by an advanced practice registered nurse, for a specified and limited time or as are necessitated by an emergency to protect the patient or resident from injury to self or others, in which case the restraint may only be applied by a qualified professional who shall set forth in writing the circumstances requiring the use of restraints and who shall promptly report the action to the attending physician, physician's assistant, or advanced practice registered nurse who authorized the restraint. In case of a chemical restraint, the physician, the physician's assistant, or the advanced practice registered nurse who authorized the restraint, shall must be consulted within 24 hours after the commencement of the chemical restraint. (m) A patient or resident is entitled to be free from performing services for the health facility or agency that are not included for therapeutic purposes in the plan of care. (n) A patient or resident is entitled to information about the health facility or agency rules and regulations affecting patient or resident care and conduct. (o) A patient or resident is entitled to adequate and appropriate pain and symptom management as a basic and essential element of his or her the patient's or resident's medical treatment. (3) The following additional requirements for the policy described in subsection (2) apply to licensees under parts 213 and 217: (a) The policy shall must be provided to each nursing home patient or home for the aged resident upon admission, and the staff of the facility shall must be trained and involved in the implementation of the policy. (b) Each nursing home patient may associate and communicate privately with persons of his or her the patient's or resident's choice. Reasonable, regular visiting hours, which shall must be not less than 8 hours per day, and which shall must take into consideration the special circumstances of each visitor, shall must be established for patients to receive visitors. A patient may be visited by the patient's attorney or by representatives of the departments named in section 20156, during other than established visiting hours. Reasonable privacy shall must be afforded for visitation of a patient who shares a room with another patient. Each patient shall must have reasonable access to a telephone. A married nursing home patient or home for the aged resident is entitled to meet privately with his or her the patient's or resident's spouse in a room that ensures privacy. If both spouses are residents in the same facility, they are entitled to share a room unless medically contraindicated and documented in the medical record by the attending physician, a physician's assistant, with whom the physician has a practice agreement, or an advanced practice registered nurse. (c) A nursing home patient or home for the aged resident is entitled to retain and use personal clothing and possessions as space permits, unless to do so would infringe upon the rights of other patients or residents, or unless medically contraindicated as documented in the medical record by the attending physician, a physician's assistant, with whom the physician has a practice agreement, or an advanced practice registered nurse. Each nursing home patient or home for the aged resident shall must be provided with reasonable space. At the request of a patient, a nursing home shall provide for the safekeeping of personal effects, money, and other property of a patient in accordance with section 21767, except that a nursing home is not required to provide for the safekeeping of a property that would impose an unreasonable burden on the nursing home. (d) A nursing home patient or home for the aged resident is entitled to the opportunity to participate in the planning of his or her the patient's or resident's medical treatment. The attending physician, a physician's assistant, with whom the physician has a practice agreement, or an advanced practice registered nurse, shall fully inform the nursing home patient of the patient's medical condition unless medically contraindicated as documented in the medical record by a physician, a physician's assistant, with whom the physician has a practice agreement, or an advanced practice registered nurse. Each nursing home patient shall must be afforded the opportunity to discharge himself or herself the patient from the nursing home. (e) A home for the aged resident may be transferred or discharged only for medical reasons, for his or her the resident's welfare or that of other residents, or for nonpayment of his or her the resident's stay, except as provided by title XVIII or title XIX. A nursing home patient may be transferred or discharged only as provided in sections 21773 to 21777. A nursing home patient or home for the aged resident is entitled to be given reasonable advance notice to ensure orderly transfer or discharge. Those actions shall must be documented in the medical record. (f) A nursing home patient or home for the aged resident is entitled to be fully informed before or at the time of admission and during stay of services available in the facility, and of the related charges including any charges for services not covered under title XVIII, or not covered by the facility's basic per diem rate. The statement of services provided by the facility shall must be in writing and shall include those required to be offered on an as-needed basis. (g) A nursing home patient or home for the aged resident is entitled to manage his or her the patient's or resident's own financial affairs, or to have at least a quarterly accounting of personal financial transactions undertaken in his or her the patient's or resident's behalf by the facility during a period of time the patient or resident has delegated those responsibilities to the facility. In addition, a patient or resident is entitled to receive each month from the facility an itemized statement setting forth the services paid for by or on behalf of the patient and the services rendered by the facility. The admission of a patient to a nursing home does not confer on the nursing home or its owner, administrator, employees, or representatives the authority to manage, use, or dispose of a patient's property. (h) A nursing home patient or a person authorized by the patient in writing may inspect and copy the patient's personal and medical records. The records shall must be made available for inspection and copying by the nursing home within a reasonable time, not exceeding 1 week, after the receipt of a written request. (i) If a nursing home patient desires treatment by a licensed member of the healing arts, the treatment shall must be made available unless it is medically contraindicated, and the medical contraindication is justified in the patient's medical record by the attending physician, a physician's assistant, with whom the physician has a practice agreement, or an advanced practice registered nurse. (j) A nursing home patient has the right to have his or her the patient's parents, if a minor, or his or her the patient's spouse, next of kin, or patient's representative, if an adult, stay at the facility 24 hours a day if the patient is considered terminally ill by the physician responsible for the patient's care, a physician's assistant, with whom the physician has a practice agreement, or an advanced practice registered nurse. (k) Each nursing home patient shall must be provided with meals that meet the recommended dietary allowances for that patient's age and sex and that may be modified according to special dietary needs or ability to chew. (l) Each nursing home patient has the right to receive representatives of approved organizations as provided in section 21763. (4) A nursing home, its owner, administrator, employee, or representative shall not discharge, harass, or retaliate or discriminate against a patient because the patient has exercised a right protected under this section. (5) In the case of a nursing home patient, the rights enumerated in subsection (2)(c), (g), and (k) and subsection (3)(d), (g), and (h) may be exercised by the patient's representative. (6) A nursing home patient or home for the aged resident is entitled to be fully informed, as evidenced by the patient's or resident's written acknowledgment, before or at the time of admission and during stay, of the policy required by this section. The policy shall must provide that if a patient or resident is adjudicated incompetent and not restored to legal capacity, the rights and responsibilities set forth in this section shall must be exercised by a person designated by the patient or resident. The health facility or agency shall provide proper forms for the patient or resident to provide for the designation of this person at the time of admission. (7) This section does not prohibit a health facility or agency from establishing and recognizing additional patients' rights. (8) As used in this section: (a) "Advanced practice registered nurse" means that term as defined in section 17201. (b) "Patient's representative" means that term as defined in section 21703. (c) "Practice agreement" means an agreement described in section 17047, 17547, or 18047. (c) (d) "Title XVIII" means title XVIII of the social security act, 42 USC 1395 to 1395lll.1395mmm. (d) (e) "Title XIX" means title XIX of the social security act, 42 USC 1396 to 1396w-5.1396w-8.